Maryland, session 2025, HB1269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1269*

HOUSE BILL 1269
Article – Environment
Subtitle 15. Zero–Emission Vehicle AND PROPANE–POWERED School Buses.
2–1501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Fund” means the Zero–Emission Vehicle AND PROPANE–POWERED School
Bus Transition Fund.
(c) “Program” means the Zero–Emission Vehicle AND PROPANE–POWERED
School Bus Transition Grant Program.
(d) “Zero–emission vehicle” has the meaning stated in § 23–206.4 of the
Transportation Article.
2–1502.
The Department and the Department of Transportation jointly shall provide
technical assistance to county boards of education and entities that contract with county
boards to provide transportation services for transitioning to the use of school buses that
are zero–emission vehicles OR ARE PROPANE–POWERED throughout the State.
2–1503.
(a) There is a Zero–Emission Vehicle AND PROPANE–POWERED School Bus
Transition Grant Program in the State.
(b) The purpose of the Program is to provide grants to county boards of education
and entities that contract with county boards to provide transportation services to:
(1) Purchase school buses that are [zero–emission]:
(I) ZERO–EMISSION vehicles; OR
(II) PROPANE–POWERED;
(2) Install electric vehicle infrastructure for charging school buses that are
zero–emission vehicles;
(3) Engage in planning for a transition to using school buses that are
zero–emission vehicles; and
(4) Fund pilot programs to experiment with a transition to school buses
that are zero–emission vehicles.

HOUSE BILL 1269 3
(c) The Department, in consultation with the State Department of Education,
shall implement and administer the Program.
(d) (1) If the Department receives any funds as a result of a legal settlement
that are earmarked for the purpose of transitioning to school buses that are zero–emission
vehicles OR PROPANE–POWERED, the funds shall be made available to award grants in
accordance with this section.
(2) In addition to any funding provided under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, funding for the Program consists of:
(i) Money appropriated in the State budget for the Program; and
(ii) Any additional money made available to the Program from any
private or public sources.
(e) The Department may adopt regulations to implement this section.
2–1504.
(a) There is a Zero–Emission Vehicle AND PROPANE–POWERED School Bus
Transition Fund.
(b) The purpose of the Fund is to provide funding for the Program.
(c) The Department, in consultation with the State Department of Education,
shall administer the Fund.
(d) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(2) Interest earnings of the Fund;
(3) Donations;
(4) Money derived from legal settlements earmarked for the purpose of
transitioning to school buses that are zero–emission vehicles OR ARE
PROPANE–POWERED; and

HOUSE BILL 1269
(5) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
(f) The Fund may be used only for the Program.
(g) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
(h) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the State
budget.
(i) Money expended from the Fund for the Program is supplemental to and is not
intended to take the place of funding that otherwise would be appropriated for the Program.
2–1505.
(a) In this section, “incremental costs” means:
(1) In the case of a contract for the purchase of school buses, the cost
difference between purchasing and operating school buses that are zero–emission vehicles
OR THAT ARE PROPANE–POWERED and school buses that are diesel–powered vehicles;
and
(2) In the case of a contract for the use of school buses, the cost difference
between contracting for the use of school buses that are zero–emission vehicles OR THAT
ARE PROPANE–POWERED and school buses that are diesel–powered vehicles.
(b) (1) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section AND SUBJECT TO
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, beginning in fiscal year 2025, a county board of
education may not enter into a new contract for:
[(1)] (I) The purchase of any school bus that is not a zero–emission
vehicle; or
[(2)] (II) The use of any school bus that is not a zero–emission vehicle,
unless the school bus has an in–service date of July 1, 2024, or before.
(2) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2030, A COUNTY BOARD OF
EDUCATION MAY ENTER INTO A NEW CONTRACT FOR THE PURCHASE OF SCHOOL
BUSES THAT ARE PROPANE–POWERED.
(c) The requirements of subsection (b) of this section do not apply if:

HOUSE BILL 1269 5
(1) The Department determines that no available zero–emission OR
PROPANE–POWERED vehicle meets the performance requirements for the county board’s
use; or
(2) The county board is unable to obtain federal, State, or private funding
sufficient to cover the incremental costs associated with contracting for the purchase or use
of school buses that are zero–emission vehicles OR THAT ARE PROPANE–POWERED.
(d) A county board may enter into an agreement with an electric company to
obtain monetary incentives in exchange for allowing the electric company to use the storage
batteries of zero–emission buses owned or operated by the county board to access the stored
electricity through vehicle–to–grid technology.
(e) The Department, in consultation with other appropriate State agencies, shall
work with the county boards and private school bus contractors to develop electric vehicle
infrastructure sufficient to support school buses that are zero–emission vehicles.
(f) The Department shall prioritize the use of available federal funding to carry
out this section.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
112. the Zero–Emission Vehicle AND PROPANE–POWERED
School Bus Transition Fund;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.